HunspellVBATests/lang/tk-TM.aff
FLAG num
SFX 55 N 806
SFX 55 0 mek .
SFX 55 0 megiň .
SFX 55 0 mäge .
SFX 55 0 megi .
SFX 55 0 mekde .
SFX 55 0 mekden .
SFX 55 0 mezlik .
SFX 55 0 mezligiň .
SFX 55 0 mezlige .
SFX 55 0 mezligi .
SFX 55 0 mezlikde .
SFX 55 0 mezlikden .
SFX 55 0 megindäki .
SFX 55 0 megindäkiniň .
SFX 55 0 megindäkä .
SFX 55 0 megindäkini .
SFX 55 0 megindäkide .
SFX 55 0 megindäkiden .
SFX 55 0 eýin .
SFX 55 0 mäýin .
SFX 55 0 me .
SFX 55 0 sin .
SFX 55 0 mesin .
SFX 55 0 eliň .
SFX 55 0 mäliň .
SFX 55 0 iň .
SFX 55 0 mäň .
SFX 55 0 sinler .
SFX 55 0 mesinler .
SFX 55 0 äýeýin .
SFX 55 0 mäýeýin .
SFX 55 0 äý .
SFX 55 0 mäý .
SFX 55 0 äýsin .
SFX 55 0 mäýsin .
SFX 55 0 äýeliň .
SFX 55 0 mäýeliň .
SFX 55 0 äýiň .
SFX 55 0 mäýiň .
SFX 55 0 äýsinler .
SFX 55 0 mäýsinler .
SFX 55 0 äýin .
SFX 55 0 mäýin .
SFX 55 0 äýeli .
SFX 55 0 mäýeli .
SFX 55 0 äýiň .
SFX 55 0 mäýiň .
SFX 55 0 äýsinler .
SFX 55 0 mäýsinler .
SFX 55 0 mezinden .
SFX 55 0 megim .
SFX 55 0 mezligim .
SFX 55 0 megimiň .
SFX 55 0 mezligimiň .
SFX 55 0 megime .
SFX 55 0 mezligime .
SFX 55 0 megimi .
SFX 55 0 mezligimi .
SFX 55 0 megimde .
SFX 55 0 mezligimde .
SFX 55 0 megimden .
SFX 55 0 mezligimden .
SFX 55 0 megiň .
SFX 55 0 mezligiň .
SFX 55 0 megiňe .
SFX 55 0 mezligiňe .
SFX 55 0 megiňi .
SFX 55 0 mezligiňi .
SFX 55 0 megiňde .
SFX 55 0 mezligiňde .
SFX 55 0 megiňden .
SFX 55 0 mezligiňden .
SFX 55 0 megi .
SFX 55 0 mezligi .
SFX 55 0 meginiň .
SFX 55 0 mezliginiň .
SFX 55 0 megine .
SFX 55 0 mezligine .
SFX 55 0 megini .
SFX 55 0 mezligini .
SFX 55 0 meginde .
SFX 55 0 mezliginde .
SFX 55 0 meginden .
SFX 55 0 mezliginden .
SFX 55 0 megimiz .
SFX 55 0 mezligimiz .
SFX 55 0 megimiziň .
SFX 55 0 mezligimiziň .
SFX 55 0 megimize .
SFX 55 0 mezligimize .
SFX 55 0 megimizi .
SFX 55 0 mezligimizi .
SFX 55 0 megimizde .
SFX 55 0 mezligimizde .
SFX 55 0 megimizden .
SFX 55 0 mezligimizden .
SFX 55 0 megiňiz .
SFX 55 0 mezligiňiz .
SFX 55 0 megiňiziň .
SFX 55 0 mezligiňiziň .
SFX 55 0 megiňize .
SFX 55 0 mezligiňize .
SFX 55 0 megiňizi .
SFX 55 0 mezligiňizi .
SFX 55 0 megiňizde .
SFX 55 0 mezligiňizde .
SFX 55 0 megiňizden .
SFX 55 0 mezligiňizden .
SFX 55 0 mekleri .
SFX 55 0 mezlikleri .
SFX 55 0 mekleriniň .
SFX 55 0 mezlikleriniň .
SFX 55 0 meklerize .
SFX 55 0 mezliklerine .
SFX 55 0 meklerini .
SFX 55 0 mezliklerini .
SFX 55 0 meklerinde .
SFX 55 0 mezliklerinde .
SFX 55 0 meklerinden .
SFX 55 0 mezliklerinden .
SFX 55 0 melidirin .
SFX 55 0 melisiň .
SFX 55 0 melidir .
SFX 55 0 melidiris .
SFX 55 0 melisiňiz .
SFX 55 0 melidirler .
SFX 55 0 melidigi .
SFX 55 0 melidiginiň .
SFX 55 0 melidigine .
SFX 55 0 melidigini .
SFX 55 0 melidiginde .
SFX 55 0 melidiginden .
SFX 55 0 meli .
SFX 55 0 jekdigim .
SFX 55 0 mejekdigim .
SFX 55 0 jekdigimiň .
SFX 55 0 mejekdigimiň .
SFX 55 0 jekdigime .
SFX 55 0 mejekdigime .
SFX 55 0 jekdigimi .
SFX 55 0 mejekdigimi .
SFX 55 0 jekdigimde .
SFX 55 0 mejekdigimde .
SFX 55 0 jekdigimden .
SFX 55 0 mejekdigimden .
SFX 55 0 jekdigiň .
SFX 55 0 mejekdigiň .
SFX 55 0 jekdigiň .
SFX 55 0 mejekdigiň .
SFX 55 0 jekdigiňe .
SFX 55 0 mejekdigiňe .
SFX 55 0 jekdigiňi .
SFX 55 0 mejekdigiňi .
SFX 55 0 jekdigiňde .
SFX 55 0 mejekdigiňde .
SFX 55 0 jekdigiňden .
SFX 55 0 mejekdigiňden .
SFX 55 0 jekdigi .
SFX 55 0 mejekdigi .
SFX 55 0 jekdiginiň .
SFX 55 0 mejekdiginiň .
SFX 55 0 jekdigine .
SFX 55 0 mejekdigine .
SFX 55 0 jekdigini .
SFX 55 0 mejekdigini .
SFX 55 0 jekdiginde .
SFX 55 0 mejekdiginde .
SFX 55 0 jekdiginden .
SFX 55 0 mejekdiginden .
SFX 55 0 jekdigimiz .
SFX 55 0 mejekdigimiz .
SFX 55 0 jekdigimiziň .
SFX 55 0 mejekdigimiziň .
SFX 55 0 jekdigimize .
SFX 55 0 mejekdigimize .
SFX 55 0 jekdigimizi .
SFX 55 0 mejekdigimizi .
SFX 55 0 jekdigimizde .
SFX 55 0 mejekdigimizde .
SFX 55 0 jekdigimizden .
SFX 55 0 mejekdigimizden .
SFX 55 0 jekdigiňiz .
SFX 55 0 mejekdigiňiz .
SFX 55 0 jekdigiňiziň .
SFX 55 0 mejekdigiňiziň .
SFX 55 0 jekdigiňize .
SFX 55 0 mejekdigiňize .
SFX 55 0 jekdigiňizi .
SFX 55 0 mejekdigiňizi .
SFX 55 0 jekdigiňizde .
SFX 55 0 mejekdigiňizde .
SFX 55 0 jekdigiňizden .
SFX 55 0 mejekdigiňizden .
SFX 55 0 jekdikleri .
SFX 55 0 mejekdikleri .
SFX 55 0 jekdikleriniň .
SFX 55 0 mejekdikleriniň .
SFX 55 0 jekdiklerine .
SFX 55 0 mejekdiklerine .
SFX 55 0 jekdiklerini .
SFX 55 0 mejekdiklerini .
SFX 55 0 jekdiklerinde .
SFX 55 0 mejekdiklerinde .
SFX 55 0 jekdiklerinden .
SFX 55 0 mejekdiklerinden .
SFX 55 0 meýänligiňiz .
SFX 55 0 meýänligiňiziň .
SFX 55 0 meýänligiňize .
SFX 55 0 meýänligiňizi .
SFX 55 0 meýänligiňizde .
SFX 55 0 meýänligiňizden .
SFX 55 0 en .
SFX 55 0 medik .
SFX 55 0 ýän .
SFX 55 0 meýän .
SFX 55 0 jek .
SFX 55 0 mejek .
SFX 55 0 mänkäm .
SFX 55 0 mänkäň .
SFX 55 0 mänkä .
SFX 55 0 mänkäk .
SFX 55 0 mänkäňiz .
SFX 55 0 mänkäler .
SFX 55 0 sem .
SFX 55 0 mesem .
SFX 55 0 seň .
SFX 55 0 meseň .
SFX 55 0 se .
SFX 55 0 mese .
SFX 55 0 sek .
SFX 55 0 mesek .
SFX 55 0 seňiz .
SFX 55 0 meseňiz .
SFX 55 0 seler .
SFX 55 0 meseler .
SFX 55 0 äýsem .
SFX 55 0 mäýsem .
SFX 55 0 äýseň .
SFX 55 0 mäýseň .
SFX 55 0 äýse .
SFX 55 0 mäýse .
SFX 55 0 äýsek .
SFX 55 0 mäýsek .
SFX 55 0 äýseňiz .
SFX 55 0 mäýseňiz .
SFX 55 0 äýseler .
SFX 55 0 mäýseler .
SFX 55 0 ýärin .
SFX 55 0 meýärin .
SFX 55 0 ýärsiň .
SFX 55 0 meýärsiň .
SFX 55 0 ýär .
SFX 55 0 meýär .
SFX 55 0 ýäris .
SFX 55 0 meýäris .
SFX 55 0 ýärsiňiz.
SFX 55 0 meýärsiňiz.
SFX 55 0 ýärler .
SFX 55 0 meýärler .
SFX 55 0 äýerin .
SFX 55 0 mäýerin .
SFX 55 0 äýersiň .
SFX 55 0 mäýersiň .
SFX 55 0 äýer .
SFX 55 0 mäýer .
SFX 55 0 äýeris .
SFX 55 0 mäýeris .
SFX 55 0 äýersiňiz.
SFX 55 0 mäýersiňiz.
SFX 55 0 äýerler .
SFX 55 0 mäýerler .
SFX 55 0 dim .
SFX 55 0 medim .
SFX 55 0 diň .
SFX 55 0 mediň .
SFX 55 0 di .
SFX 55 0 medi .
SFX 55 0 dik .
SFX 55 0 medik .
SFX 55 0 diňiz .
SFX 55 0 mediňiz .
SFX 55 0 diler .
SFX 55 0 mediler .
SFX 55 0 äýdim .
SFX 55 0 äýdiň .
SFX 55 0 äýdi .
SFX 55 0 äýdik .
SFX 55 0 äýdiňiz .
SFX 55 0 äýdiler .
SFX 55 0 erin .
SFX 55 0 merin .
SFX 55 0 ersiň .
SFX 55 0 mersiň .
SFX 55 0 er .
SFX 55 0 mez .
SFX 55 0 eris .
SFX 55 0 meris .
SFX 55 0 ersiňiz .
SFX 55 0 mersiňiz .
SFX 55 0 erler .
SFX 55 0 mezler .
SFX 55 0 mäň .
SFX 55 0 meziň .
SFX 55 0 meze .
SFX 55 0 mezi .
SFX 55 0 mezde .
SFX 55 0 mezden .
SFX 55 0 mändigi .
SFX 55 0 mändiginiň .
SFX 55 0 mändigine .
SFX 55 0 mändigini .
SFX 55 0 mändiginde .
SFX 55 0 mändiginden .
SFX 55 0 mänligi .
SFX 55 0 mänliginiň .
SFX 55 0 mänligine .
SFX 55 0 mänligini .
SFX 55 0 mänliginde .
SFX 55 0 mänliginden .
SFX 55 0 eniň .
SFX 55 0 eniňe .
SFX 55 0 eniňi .
SFX 55 0 eniňde .
SFX 55 0 eniňden .
SFX 55 0 ip .
SFX 55 0 män .
SFX 55 0 semdim .
SFX 55 0 sedim .
SFX 55 0 mesedim .
SFX 55 0 sediň .
SFX 55 0 mesediň .
SFX 55 0 sedi .
SFX 55 0 mesedi .
SFX 55 0 sedik .
SFX 55 0 mesedik .
SFX 55 0 sediňiz .
SFX 55 0 mesediňiz .
SFX 55 0 sediler .
SFX 55 0 mesediler .
SFX 55 0 erdim .
SFX 55 0 erdiň .
SFX 55 0 erdi .
SFX 55 0 erdik .
SFX 55 0 erdiňiz .
SFX 55 0 erdiler .
SFX 55 0 mezdim .
SFX 55 0 mezdiň .
SFX 55 0 mezdi .
SFX 55 0 mezdik .
SFX 55 0 mezdiňiz .
SFX 55 0 mezdiler .
SFX 55 0 iş .
SFX 55 l lşiň .
SFX 55 l lşe .
SFX 55 l lşi .
SFX 55 l lşde .
SFX 55 l lşden .
SFX 55 l lşim .
SFX 55 l lşimiň .
SFX 55 l lşime .
SFX 55 l lşimi .
SFX 55 l lşimde .
SFX 55 l lşimden .
SFX 55 l lşiň .
SFX 55 l lşiňe .
SFX 55 l lşiňi .
SFX 55 l lşiňde .
SFX 55 l lşiňden .
SFX 55 l lşi .
SFX 55 l lşiniň .
SFX 55 l lşine .
SFX 55 l lşini .
SFX 55 l lşinde .
SFX 55 l lşinden .
SFX 55 l lşimiz .
SFX 55 l lşimiziň .
SFX 55 l lşimize .
SFX 55 l lşimizi .
SFX 55 l lşimizde .
SFX 55 l lşimizden .
SFX 55 l lşiňiz .
SFX 55 l lşiňiziň .
SFX 55 l lşiňize .
SFX 55 l lşiňizi .
SFX 55 l lşiňizde .
SFX 55 l lşiňizden .
SFX 55 n nşiň .
SFX 55 n nşe .
SFX 55 n nşi .
SFX 55 n nşde .
SFX 55 n nşden .
SFX 55 n nşim .
SFX 55 n nşimiň .
SFX 55 n nşime .
SFX 55 n nşimi .
SFX 55 n nşimde .
SFX 55 n nşimden .
SFX 55 n nşiň .
SFX 55 n nşiňe .
SFX 55 n nşiňi .
SFX 55 n nşiňde .
SFX 55 n nşiňden .
SFX 55 n nşi .
SFX 55 n nşiniň .
SFX 55 n nşine .
SFX 55 n nşini .
SFX 55 n nşinde .
