HunspellVBATests/lang/tk-TM.dic
aktiwleş/55
bagyryber/55
begendir/55
bejeriş/55
bekleş/55
bellen/55
berçinlen/55
berkidil/55
berkleş/55
beterleşdir/55
bezdir/55
bez/55
biçil/55
biç/55
bil/55
birleşdir/55
bişir/55
bitiriş/55
blokirlen/55
bökdür/55
böldür/55
bölüniş/55
börtül/55
böwüsdir/55
bürel/55
büzdür/55
çekdiril/55
çekeleş/55
çekişdir/55
çemelen/55
çenen/55
çepçileş/55
çetinleşdir/55
çetleş/55
çäklendiril/55
çäşer/55
çigitleş/55
çikjer/55
çiňeriş/55
çirtdir/55
çiş/55
çitiş/55
çökeriş/55
çöňňer/55
çöşlen/55
çözdür/55
çözüş/55
çümşüldeş/55
çürtül/55
çüýjeril/55
çüýreş/55
debsil/55
degşiril/55
delillendir/55
demikdir/55
demrikdir/55
deňlen/55
depelen/55
depiş/55
derdiniş/55
derňel/55
dertleş/55
deşil/55
dän/55
dikeldil/55
dikil/55
dileş/55
dillen/55
diňirgeniş/55
diň/55
diskriminerlen/55
diýdir/55
dökül/55
döküş/55
dörjel/55
dörüş/55
dümtün/55
düňküldeş/55
dürteriş/55
dürtüş/55
düşeş/55
düşündür/55
düşün/55
düşür/55
düwündir/55
düýrükdir/55
düzediş/55
düzgünleşdir/55
ebedileşdir/55
edişdir/55
egildir/55
eg/55
egrin/55
ekdir/55
ekiş/55
ekleş/55
elendir/55
ellen/55
eltil/55
emedeklen/55
emen/55
emlen/55
entrekleş/55
eňliş/55
eňteril/55
epeýlen/55
epleş/55
erbetleş/55
ersdir/55
esreş/55
eşitdir/55
eýelen/55
eýger/55
eýleş/55
ezberleş/55
ezin/55
ädimlen/55
ägin/55
äkel/55
äkitdir/55
äňetdir/55
ätdir/55
galyber/55
geçiriber/55
geliber/55
gelşir/55
geňirgendir/55
geplen/55
ger/55
getir/55
geýindir/55
gezekleşiber/55
gezeş/55
geziş/55
gäber/55
gäwüşeş/55
gijikdir/55
giriber/55
giriz/55
goýberiber/55
göger/55
gönderil/55
gönen/55
göreşdir/55
görüber/55
göteriş/55
gözelleş/55
gözükdir/55
güjürdeş/55
gülüşdir/55
güpberil/55
gürel/55
güsürdeş/55
güýçlen/55
güýmen/55
hekgeril/55
hekleş/55
hereketlendir/55
heserlen/55
hezzetlen/55
häzirlen/55
hödürlenil/55
hönküldeş/55
höweslen/55
hümmüldeş/55
hüşer/55
iberil/55
içer/55
içiş/55
idel/55
igeniş/55
ikirjiňleş/55
ilişdir/55
ilten/55
importirlen/55
inçel/55
indir/55
iňren/55
irkiliş/55
işdir/55
işledil/55
iş/55
itekleş/55
iter/55
itişidir/55
iýdir/55
iýmitlen/55
jebisleş/55
jemlen/55
jetleş/55
jibirdeş/55
jikjeriş/55
jiňkeril/55
jirkildeş/55
jürleş/55
kebşirlen/55
kelçer/55
keltel/55
kemsidil/55
kentil/55
kepilleşdir/55
kertiliş/55
kesdir/55
kesgitlenil/55
kesiş/55
keýeril/55
keýkeril/55
keýplen/55
kämilleşdiril/55
käselen/55
käýel/55
kiçel/55
kişçiklen/55
köjel/55
kökeril/55
kömekleş/55
köpel/55
kösendir/55
kössekleş/55
köwdür/55
köwerjeňleş/55
köwzeş/55
küdeleş/55
küljer/55
külüňlen/55
kür/55
kürtdür/55
küteliş/55
küýkeriş/55
laminirlen/55
leňkildeş/55
lägir/55
läşer/55
medeniýetleş/55
merkezleşdir/55
meýilleşdiril/55
mäleş/55
möçükdir/55
möleş/55
müdimileşdiril/55
mündür/55
müňzeş/55
müýnürgen/55
nemlen/55
näzirgen/55
öçüriş/55
öjeşdir/55
ökündir/55
ölçel/55
öldür/55
ölügsilen/55
öpüş/55
örtendir/55
örün/55
ösdür/55
ötür/55
öwredil/55
öwren/55
öwsün/55
öýkündir/55
öýkün/55
özelen/55
pelpelleş/55
perdelen/55
peşewlen/55
petiklen/55
petreş/55
pezzer/55
pikirlen/55
pişekleş/55
pöwhüldeş/55
pürkdür/55
püwdür/55
redusirlen/55
rejeleş/55
reňklen/55
resenzirlen/55
saýlap-seç/55
seçelen/55
sek/55
seljer/55
seňkildeş/55
sepikdir/55
seplen/55
seredil/55
serginleş/55
sermen/55
serp/55
setirlen/55
seýislen/55
sägin/55
silkdir/55
silk/55
siňdir/55
siý/55
sög/55
sögüş/55
söküş/55
söndür/55
söweş/55
söýeş/55
sözleş/55
südürlen/55
sülleriş/55
sülpüldeş/55
sümsündir/55
sünnetlen/55
süpüriniber/55
sürdür/55
sürmelen/55
sürten/55
süssenekleş/55
süýgüş/55
süýndür/55
süýreş/55
süýşür/55
süzüş/55
şeklen/55
şertlendir/55
şifrlen/55
şübhelen/55
tebsin/55
tekizleş/55
ten/55
terbiýelen/55
terpeş/55
tertipleş/55
tezdir/55
tänder/55
täsirleş/55
tigirleş/55
tikil/55
tirdir/55
tirkeş/55
tisgin/55
tizleşdir/55
töleş/55
tözlen/55
tüken/55
tümmeriş/55
tüpeňlen/55
tüteş/55
tüýdüş/55
tüýküril/55
tüýkürr/55
üleş/55
ümmüldeş/55
ürküzil/55
ütüklen/55
üwreş/55
üýşüril/55
üzňeleş/55
ýegdekleş/55
ýelejir/55
ýelmeş/55
ýençdir/55
ýeňleş/55
ýerleşdir/55
ýetir/55
ýigrendir/55
ýitilen/55
ýöňkel/55
ýükleşdir/55
ýüzleşdir/55
zeýreniş/55
zürrel/55
çölleş/55
integrirle/55
